Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.150

Uniform commercial code powers, duties, and functions transferred to department of licensing.

All powers, duties, and functions vested by law in the secretary of state relating to the Uniform Commercial Code are transferred to the department of licensing.

[ 1979 c 158 s 92; 1977 ex.s. c 117 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 117: "If any provision of this 1977 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1977 ex.s. c 117 s 13.]

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 117: "This 1977 amendatory act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1977." [ 1977 ex.s. c 117 s 14.]